Nevada, session 83, SB307.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 232.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.475 1. In accomplishing its purposes, the Office shall:
(a) Provide a central source of information for the use of the
public concerning health care services for members of minority
groups and health care issues of interest to those members;
(b) Identify and use any available resources for the improvement
of the quality of health care services for members of minority
groups and for increased access to health care services for those
members;
(c) Develop and coordinate plans and programs to improve the
quality of health care services for members of minority groups and
to increase access to health care services for those members,
including, without limitation, plans and programs that primarily
serve local communities;
(d) Research and make recommendations to the Public Health
Resource Officer appointed pursuant to NRS 223.950 concerning
strategies to address disparate health outcomes in:
(1) Communities of Black persons, Indigenous persons and
persons of color resulting from systemic racism and structures of
racial discrimination; and
(2) Rural communities and other underserved communities;
(e) Hold conferences and provide training concerning cultural
diversity in the workplace for public and private entities that offer
services in the field of health care, including, without limitation,
providing recommendations and opportunities for training for such
-
*SB307*

– 3 –
public and private entities to improve recruitment of members of
minority groups;
(f) Whenever possible, incorporate the use of bilingual
communication in its programs and activities;
(g) Identify and analyze gaps in health and human services
delivered to members of minority groups in this State;
(h) Publicize health care issues of interest to members of
minority groups; and
[(h)] (i) Develop and carry out such other programs and
activities as the Office deems appropriate.
2. In carrying out the duties set forth in subsection 1, the Office
may seek assistance from and cooperate with a public or private
entity.
Sec. 2. NRS 239B.026 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239B.026 1. A governmental agency that requests from a
person information related to the person’s race or ethnicity shall also
request information related to the person’s sexual orientation and
gender identity or expression. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, all information related to a person’s sexual orientation or
gender identity or expression that is received by a governmental
agency is confidential.
2. No person shall be:
(a) Required to provide to a governmental agency any
information related to the person’s sexual orientation or gender
identity or expression; or
(b) Denied services or assistance from a governmental agency
for failure to provide to the governmental agency any information
related to the person’s sexual orientation or gender identity or
expression.
3. A governmental agency that receives information related to
a person’s sexual orientation or gender identity or expression may
only use such information for carrying out the duties of the
governmental agency, demographic analysis, coordination of care
and services, improvement of care and services, conducting
research, fulfilling a reporting requirement pursuant to federal or
state law or informing policy or funding decisions.
4. On or before December 31 of each year, a governmental
agency shall submit [to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not
in session, to the Legislative Commission,] a summary of the
information received by the governmental agency related to sexual
orientation or gender identity or expression, including, without
limitation, the number of people who identify as lesbian, gay,
bisexual or transgender, according to race and gender [.] , to:
-
*SB307*

– 4 –
(a) The Office of Minority Health and Equity of the
Department of Health and Human Services; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in
session, to the Legislative Commission.
5. All information submitted pursuant to subsection 4 must be
reported in the aggregate and must not include any personally
identifiable information.
Sec. 3. NRS 433.359 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.359 1. The Division may apply for grants available from
the Federal Government and other sources which have the express
purpose of addressing disparities in behavioral health care and
behavioral health outcomes based on race, color, ancestry, national
origin, disability, familial status, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression, immigration status, primary language or
income level.
2. To the extent authorized by the terms of a grant obtained
pursuant to subsection 1, the Division may:
(a) Use a competitive process to select and award a grant of
money to a nonprofit organization to serve as a lead partner to
ensure that services supported by a grant obtained pursuant to
subsection 1 are funded and allocated in an equitable manner. The
lead partner must:
(1) Be based in the community to which the services are to
be provided; and
(2) Have demonstrated experience serving that community.
(b) Establish and consult with an advisory committee to ensure
that services supported by a grant obtained pursuant to subsection 1
are provided in a culturally competent manner. The advisory
committee must be composed of representatives of nonprofit
organizations that have demonstrated experience serving the
community to which the services are to be provided.
3. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report that includes, without limitation:
(1) The amount of money allocated by the Department
during the immediately preceding calendar year to support the
provision of behavioral health services or other services to promote
emotional well-being in communities with higher risk of behavioral
health problems, decreased access to or usage of behavioral health
services or worse behavioral health outcomes or emotional well-
being than the general population based on race, color, ancestry,
national origin, disability, familial status, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity or expression, immigration status, primary language
or income level;
-
*SB307*

– 5 –
(2) A description of the services described in subparagraph
(1) that were provided during the immediately preceding calendar
year and the efforts made by the Department during the immediately
preceding calendar year to locate persons in need of such services
and provide such services to those persons;
(3) The number of persons who received the services
described in subparagraph (1) and, to the extent available,
information regarding the income level, age, race and ethnicity of
those persons; and
(4) Any community-based organizations with which the
Department collaborated to provide those services; [and]
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission and
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature [.] ; and
(c) Submit the report to the Office of Minority Health and
Equity of the Department.
Sec. 4. NRS 439.259 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.259 1. The Division may apply for grants available from
the Federal Government and other sources which have the express
purpose of addressing disparities in health care and health outcomes
based on race, color, ancestry, national origin, disability, familial
status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,
immigration status, primary language or income level.
2. To the extent authorized by the terms of a grant obtained
pursuant to subsection 1, the Division may:
(a) Use a competitive process to select and award a grant of
money to a nonprofit organization to serve as a lead partner to
ensure that health care services supported by a grant obtained
pursuant to subsection 1 are funded and allocated in an equitable
manner. The lead partner must:
(1) Be based in the community to which the health care
services are to be provided; and
(2) Have demonstrated experience serving that community.
(b) Establish and consult with an advisory committee to ensure
that health care services supported by a grant obtained pursuant to
subsection 1 are provided in a culturally competent manner. The
advisory committee must be composed of representatives of
nonprofit organizations that have demonstrated experience serving
the community to which the health care services are to be provided.
3. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report that includes, without limitation:
-
*SB307*

– 6 –
(1) The amount of money allocated by the Department
during the immediately preceding calendar year to support the
provision of health care services or other services to promote
physical well-being in communities with higher risk of health
problems, decreased access to or usage of health care services or
worse health outcomes or physical well-being than the general
population based on race, color, ancestry, national origin, disability,
familial status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,
immigration status, primary language or income level;
(2) A description of the services described in subparagraph
(1) that were provided during the immediately preceding calendar
year and the efforts made by the Department during the immediately
preceding calendar year to locate persons in need of such services
and provide such services to those persons;
(3) The number of persons who received the services
described in subparagraph (1) and, to the extent available,
information regarding the income level, age, race and ethnicity of
those persons; and
(4) Any community-based organizations with which the
Department collaborated to provide those services; [and]
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission and
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature [.] ; and
(c) Submit the report to the Office of Minority Health and
Equity of the Department.
Sec. 5. NRS 439.261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.261 1. The Division may apply for grants available from
the Federal Government and other sources to support the
identification, understanding and mitigation of health disparities
relating to kidney disease that are based on race. Such disparities
include, without limitation, disparities concerning:
(a) Early detection, frequency and severity of kidney disease;
and
(b) Promotion of kidney transplantation.
2. The Division may establish and consult with an advisory
committee to establish a sustainable plan to increase education
concerning and awareness of kidney disease through which services
supported by a grant obtained pursuant to subsection 1 may, to the
extent applicable and authorized by the terms of the grant, be
delivered. The advisory committee must be composed of
representatives of providers of health care and medical facilities
-
*SB307*

– 7 –
who provide care for kidney disease, patients with kidney disease,
organ procurement organizations, national kidney organizations and
any other members that the Division deems appropriate.
3. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall
compile a report that includes, without limitation, the status of
grants applied for during the immediately preceding calendar year
pursuant to subsection 1 and submit the report to [the] :
(a) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
[(a)] (1) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission
and the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services; and
[(b)] (2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature [.] ; and
(b) The Office of Minority Health and Equity of the
Department.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Organ procurement organization” means a person
designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
H
-
*SB307*